Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4036
Dissolved district; assets; disposition.

Upon dissolution of a business improvement district, any proceeds of any general business occupation tax or the special assessment, or assets acquired with such proceeds, shall be subject to disposition as the city council shall determine.

Laws 1979, LB 251, § 22;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 229.